District of Columbia statutes.
7-1301.01

[Reserved].

Section References

This section is referenced in § 21-1114, § 21-1115, § 21-2002, and § 21-2203.

Editor's Notes

Section 17(a) of D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “Citizens with Intellectual Disabilities” for “Mentally Retarded Persons” in the subtitle heading.

Section 17(b) of D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “Rights of Citizens with Intellectual Disabilities” for “Mentally Retarded Citizens” in the chapter heading.